Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.601

Hazards to the public—Information—Legislative findings, policy, intent.

The legislature finds that public health and safety is promoted when the public has knowledge that enables members of the public to make informed choices about risks to their health and safety. Therefore, the legislature declares as a matter of public policy that the public has a right to information necessary to protect members of the public from harm caused by alleged hazards to the public. The legislature also recognizes that protection of trade secrets, other confidential research, development, or commercial information concerning products or business methods promotes business activity and prevents unfair competition. Therefore, the legislature declares it a matter of public policy that the confidentiality of such information be protected and its unnecessary disclosure be prevented.

[ 1994 c 42 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—1994 c 42: "This act applies to all confidentiality provisions entered or executed with respect to product liability/hazardous substance claims on or after May 1, 1994." [ 1994 c 42 s 3.]

Effective date—1994 c 42: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect May 1, 1994." [ 1994 c 42 s 4.]